Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 14.6 Insurance Premium Finance Agreements

19-14.6-1.
Form of agreement.

Every agreement shall:

Be dated and signed by, or on behalf of, the insured, and the printed portion thereof shall be in at least eight-point (8) type;

Contain the names and place of business of the insurance producer negotiating the insurance contract or contracts thereto relating, the name and residence, or place of business, of the insured, as specified by the insured, the name and place of business of the company to which payments under the agreement are to be made, a brief description of the insurance contract or contracts, and the amount of the premium or premiums therefore; and

Set forth following items where they are applicable:

The total amount of the premium or premiums;

The amount of the down payment;

The principal balance, the difference between (i) and (ii);

The amount of interest to be charged;

The balance payable by the insured, sum of items (iii) and (iv); and

The number of installments required, the amount of each installment expressed in dollars, and the due date or period thereof.

The items set forth in subdivision (a)(3) need not be stated in the sequence in which they appear in subdivision (a)(3), and additional items may be included to explain computations made in determining the amount to be paid by the insured.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 79, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 82, § 4.

19-14.6-2.
Limitation on interest and other charges.

An insurance premium finance company shall not charge, contract for, receive, or collect any interest or discount charges at a rate in excess of that provided in §

6-26-2

.

Interest on any insurance premium finance agreement is to be computed on the balance of the premium or premiums due, after subtracting the down payment made by the insured in accordance with the agreement, from the effective date of the insurance contract, for which the premium or premiums is or are being advanced, to and including the date when the final installment provided for in the agreement is due and payable. The interest so provided for by this chapter anticipates timely repayment, in consecutive equal monthly installments, for a period of one year. With respect to contractual arrangements for repayment in greater or lesser periods, or in unequal, irregular, or other than monthly installments, interest may be computed at an equivalent effective rate, likewise, having due regard for timely payments of installments.

A service charge of fifteen dollars ($15.00) per insurance premium finance agreement, which need not be refunded upon cancellation or prepayment, may be imposed as long as the imposition of said service charge does not cause the total charges provided for in the agreement to exceed that specified in §

6-26-2

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any agreement, an insured may prepay the obligation in full at any time. In that event, the insured shall receive a refund credit. (The refund credit shall represent at least as great a proportion of the interest as the sum of the periodic balances following the month in which prepayment is made bears the sum of all periodic balances under the schedule of installments in the agreement.) If the amount of a refund credit is less than one dollar ($1.00), no actual refund need be made.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 79, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 82, § 4.

19-14.6-3.
Delinquency and cancellation charges.

An insurance premium finance agreement may provide for payment by the insured of a delinquency charge ranging from one dollar ($1.00) to a maximum of five percent (5%) of an installment that is in default for a period of five (5) days or more.

The agreement may provide for payment by the insured of a cancellation charge of fifteen dollars ($15.00) if the default results in cancellation of any insurance contract or contracts listed in the agreement.

An agreement may also provide for payment, upon default, of reasonable costs of collection, including reasonable attorneys’ fees.

None of the charges referred to in this section shall be considered directly or indirectly in determining whether a violation of the usury laws has occurred under an agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 79, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 82, § 4.

19-14.6-4.
Cancellation of insurance contract upon default.

When an insurance premium finance agreement contains a power of attorney enabling the company to cancel an insurance contract or contracts listed in the agreement, the insurance contract or contracts shall not be cancelled by the company unless the cancellation is effectuated in accordance with this section.

Not less than ten (10) days written notice shall be mailed to the insured, at his or her last known address, as shown on the records of the company, of the intention of the company, to cancel the insurance contract or contracts unless the default is removed within the ten-day (10) period.

After expiration of the ten-day (10) period, the company may cancel the insurance contract or contracts by mailing to the insurer a notice of cancellation. The insurance contract or contracts shall be cancelled as if notice of cancellation had been submitted by the insured personally, but without requiring return of the insurance contract or contracts. The company shall also mail a notice of cancellation to the insured at his or her last known address as shown on the records of the company. The insurance contract or contracts shall be cancelled by the insurer on a pro rata basis.

All statutory, regulatory, and contractual restrictions providing that an insurance contract may not be cancelled unless notice be given to a particular governmental agency, mortgagee, or other third party shall be applicable to any cancellation effected under the provisions of this section. The insurer shall give the prescribed notice on behalf of itself or the insured to any governmental agency, mortgagee, or other third party on or before the second business day after the day it receives notice of cancellation from the company, and shall determine the effective date of cancellation, taking into consideration the number of days’ notice required to complete the cancellation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 79, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 82, § 4.

19-14.6-5.
Return premiums.

Whenever a financed insurance contract or contracts is cancelled, the insurer shall return the gross unearned premium or premiums, if any, that may be due under the insurance contract or contracts, directly to the insurance premium finance company for the account of the insured, as soon as reasonably possible, but, in no event, shall the period for the return exceed sixty (60) days after the effective date of cancellation. In the event that crediting of a return premium or premiums to the account of an insured results in a surplus over the amount due from the insured, the insurance premium finance company shall refund the excess to the insured, provided that no refund shall be required if the refund amounts to less than one dollar ($1.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 79, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 82, § 4.

19-14.6-6.
Exemption from filing requirements.

Filing of the insurance premium finance agreement shall not be necessary to perfect validity thereof, as a secured transaction against creditors, subsequent purchasers, pledgees, encumbrancers, trustees in bankruptcy, or other insolvency proceeding under any law or any person having the status, power, or authority of the aforementioned, or their successors or assigns.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 79, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 82, § 4.

19-14.6-7.
Reimbursement for orthotic and prosthetic services.

As used in this section:

“Federal reimbursement rates” means the current listed fee schedule from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, listing the current Healthcare Common Procedure Coding system (HCPCS) and the corresponding reimbursement rates.

“Orthosis” means a custom fabricated brace or support that is designed based on medical necessity. Orthosis does not include prefabricated or direct-formed orthotic devices, as defined in this section, or any of the following assistive technology devices: commercially available knee orthoses used following injury or surgery; spastic muscle-tone inhibiting orthoses; upper extremity adaptive equipment; finger splints; hand splints; wrist gauntlets; face masks used following burns; wheelchair seating that is an integral part of the wheelchair and not worn by the patient independent of the wheelchair; fabric or elastic supports; corsets; low-temperature formed plastic splints; trusses; elastic hose; canes; crutches; cervical collars; dental appliances; and other similar devices as determined by the director of the department of health, such as those commonly carried in stock by a pharmacy, department store, corset shop, or surgical supply facility.

“Orthotics” means the science and practice of evaluating, measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting, adjusting or servicing, as well as providing the initial training necessary to accomplish the fitting of, an orthosis for the support, correction, or alleviation of neuromuscular or musculoskeletal dysfunction, disease, injury, or deformity. The practice of orthotics encompasses evaluation, treatment, and consultation; with basic observational gait and postural analysis, orthotists assess and design orthoses to maximize function and provide not only the support but the alignment necessary to either prevent or correct a deformity or to improve the safety and efficiency of mobility or locomotion or both. Orthotic practice includes providing continuing patient care in order to assess its effect on the patient’s tissues and to assure proper fit and function of the orthotic device by periodic evaluation.

“Prosthesis” means an artificial limb that is alignable or, in lower-extremity applications, capable of weight bearing. Prosthesis means an artificial medical device that is not surgically implanted and that is used to replace a missing limb, appendage, or other external human body part, including an artificial limb, hand, or foot. The term does not include artificial eyes, ears, noses, dental appliances, osotmy products, or devices such as eyelashes or wigs.

“Prosthetics” means the science and practice of evaluation, measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting, aligning, adjusting, or servicing, as well as providing the initial training necessary to accomplish the fitting of, a prosthesis through the replacement of external parts of a human body lost due to amputation or congenital deformities or absences. The practice of prosthetics also includes the generation of an image, form, or mold that replicates the patient’s body or body segment and that requires rectification of dimensions, contours, and volumes for use in the design and fabrication of a socket to accept a residual anatomic limb to, in turn, create an artificial appendage that is designed either to support body weight or to improve or restore function or cosmesis, or both. Involved in the practice of prosthetics is observational gait analysis and clinical assessment of the requirements necessary to refine and mechanically fix the relative position of various parts of the prosthesis to maximize function, stability, and safety of the patient. The practice of prosthetics includes providing and continuing patient care in order to assess the prosthetic device’s effect on the patient’s tissues and to assure proper fit and function of the prosthetic device by periodic evaluation.

“Private insurance company” means any insurance company, or management company hired by an insurance company, that is any of the following:

Based in the state of Rhode Island; or

Provides coverage for citizens for the state of Rhode Island; or

Allows subscribing patients to seek prosthetic or orthotic services in the state of Rhode Island.

Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered; issued for delivery; or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2006, that provides medical coverage that includes coverage for physician services in a physician’s office, and every policy that provides major medical or similar comprehensive type coverage shall provide coverage for benefits for orthotic and prosthetic devices that equal those benefits provided for under federal laws for health insurance for the aged and disabled pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §§ 1395k, 1395l, and 1395m and 42 C.F.R. §§ 414.202, 414.210, 414.228, and 410.100 as applicable to this section.

A health insurance contract, plan, or policy may require prior authorization for orthotic and prosthetic devices in the same manner that prior authorization is required for any other covered benefit.

Covered benefits for orthotic or prosthetic devices shall be limited to the most appropriate model that adequately meets the medical needs of the patient as determined by the insured’s treating physician.

The repair and replacement of orthotic or prosthetic devices also shall be covered subject to co-payments and deductibles, unless necessitated by misuse or loss.

An insurer may require, if coverage is provided through a managed care plan, that benefits mandated pursuant to this section be covered benefits only if the orthotic or prosthetic devices are provided by a vendor and orthotic or prosthetic services are rendered by a provider who is licensed by the state of Rhode Island to provide orthotics and prosthetics.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 210, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 380, § 4.